pron.demonstr.che.lexd
PATTERNS
# Singular
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr><obl>:] Case[erg_o]
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[upn] Case[gen]
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[u] Case[comp-comp_la]
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[un] (Case[dat] | Case[ins] | Case[loc])
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[un] Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?

# Plural
DemonstrProPl [<pro><demonstr><obl>:]Plural[Pl_sh]
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[er] Case[gen]
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[ar] (Case[dat] | Case[comp-comp_la] | Case[erg_a] | Case[loc])
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[apr] Case[ins]
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[apr] Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?

# Attributive use
DemonstrProAbsAttr [<pro><demonstr>:]
DemonstrProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ProOblique[u]

# Singular (adverbal pronouns, incline like adjectives)
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] AdjCase[abs] #absolutive
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ((AdjOblique[u] Case[Adj_u]) | (AdjOblique[un] Case[Adj_un]) | (AdjOblique[upn] Case[Adj_upn]) | (AdjOblique[ch] Case[Adj_ch]))   # singular Oblique cases
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] AdjOblique[upn] Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))                                                                         # derived allative cases 

# Plural (adverbal pronouns, incline like adjectives)
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] AdjCase[plabs] #absolutive
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] (AdjOblique[ch] Plural[Pl_j] Case[Pl_j] | AdjOblique[u] Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh])                 # plural -чу-   
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] AdjOblique[u] Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh,all_der] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?                      # plural -чу- Allative derivatives
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] ((AdjOblique[pl_a]  (Case[Adj_u,-loc,-gen] | Case[Adj_un])) | (AdjOblique[pl_ap] (Case[Adj_upn] | (Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))))))     # plural -чар-, -чер-, -чаьр-
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] AdjOblique[pl_a] Epent Case[loc]
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:]AdjOblique[pl_e] Case[gen]

# Attributive use (adverbal pronouns, incline like adjectives)
DemonstrAdvProAbsAttr [<pro><demonstr>:]
DemonstrAdvProObl [<pro><demonstr>:] AdjOblique[u]

LEXICON DemonstrProAbsAttr
хӀара
я

LEXICON DemonstrProAbsSubst
хӀара:хӀара
я:яра

LEXICON DemonstrProObl
хӀара:хӀокх
я:йокх

LEXICON DemonstrProPl
хӀара:хӀор
я:йор

LEXICON ProOblique
<obl>:у[u]
<obl>:ун[un]
<obl>:уьн[upn]
<obl><pl>:ер[er]
<obl><pl>:ар[ar]
<obl><pl>:аьр[apr]


# Склоняются совсем как прилагательные
LEXICON DemonstrAdvProAbsAttr
дӀара
хьуьллара
цигара
кхузара

LEXICON DemonstrAdvProObl
дӀара:дӀара
хьуьллара:хьуьллар
цигара:цигар
кхузара:кхузар
